test/src/morphology/V-argnwma62_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `argnõma: # Verb (62) `argnõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `argnõma+V+Inf/mA: `argnõma
     `argnõma+V+Inf: arõdaq
     `argnõma+V+ActPrtPrc: arõnuq
     `argnõma+V+PssPrtPrc: arõt
     `argnõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: `argnõ
     `argnõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: `argnõs
     `argnõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `argsi
     `argnõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: arõú
